District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.162

Repealed

Close corporations — Involuntary termination of close corporation status; proceeding to prevent loss of status.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 162
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(iii), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 29-399.61.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.162.